Utah statutes.
63G-6-206.   Transfer of power to policy board.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all rights, powers, duties, and
authority relating to the procurement of supplies, services, and construction,
and the management, control, warehousing, and sale of supplies, services, and
construction vested in or exercised by any state agency on the effective date
are transferred to the policy board as they relate to its duties and to the
Division of Purchasing and General Services as they relate to its duties.
